Vermont, session 2025-2026, H194.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 3448 is amended to read:
§ 3448. APPROVAL AND FUNDING OF SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION
PROJECTS; RENEWABLE ENERGY
(a) Construction aid.
* * *
(2) Approval of preliminary application.
(A) When reviewing a preliminary application for approval, the
Secretary shall consider:
VT LEG #379950 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.194
2025 Page 2 of 3
(i) regional educational opportunities and needs, including school
building capacities across school district boundaries, and available
infrastructure in neighboring communities;
(ii) economic efficiencies;
(iii) the suitability of an existing school building to continue to
meet educational needs; and
(iv) statewide educational initiatives and the strategic plan of the
State Board of Education.
(B) The Secretary may approve a preliminary application if:
(i) the project or part of the project fulfills a need occasioned by:
(I) conditions that threaten the health or safety of students or
employees;
(II) facilities that are inadequate to provide programs required
by State or federal law or regulation;
(III) excessive energy use resulting from the design of a
building or reliance on fossil fuels or electric space heat; or
(IV) deterioration of an existing building;
(ii) the need addressed by the project cannot reasonably be met by
another means; and
VT LEG #379950 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.194
2025 Page 3 of 3
(iii) the proposed type, kind, quality, size, and estimated cost of
the project are suitable for the proposed curriculum and meet all legal
standards; and
(iv) the project includes the creation of a high-capacity, all-gender
restroom with fully enclosed stalls.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379950 v.1